North Carolina statutes. Chapter 113. Conservation and Development.
Article 22. Regulation of Wildlife.

§ 113-291.
General restrictions.

Except as specifically permitted in this Subchapter or in rules made under the authority of this Subchapter, no person may take, possess, buy, sell, or transport any wildlife — whether dead or alive, in whole or in part. Nor may any person take, possess, buy, sell, or transport any nests or eggs of wild birds except as so permitted. No person may take, possess, buy, sell, or transport any wildlife resources in violation of the rules of the Wildlife Resources Commission.

History.

1965, c. 957, s. 2; 1979, c. 830, s. 1; 1987, c. 827, s. 98.

Local Modification.

(As to Article 22) Davidson: 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 852, s. 1; Davie: 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 929, s. 1.

§ 113-291.1.
Manner of taking wild animals and wild birds.

Except as otherwise provided, game may only be taken between a half hour before sunrise and a half hour after sunset and only by one or a combination of the following methods:

With a rifle, except that rifles may not be used in taking wild turkeys.

With a shotgun not larger than number 10 gauge.

With a bow and arrow of a type prescribed in the rules of the Wildlife Resources Commission.

With the use of dogs.

By means of falconry.

Fur-bearing animals may be taken at any time during open trapping season with traps authorized under

G.S. 113-291.6

and as otherwise authorized pursuant to this subsection, and rabbits may be box-trapped in accordance with rules of the Wildlife Resources Commission. The Wildlife Resources Commission may adopt rules prescribing the manner of taking wild birds and wild animals not classified as game. Use of pistols in taking wildlife is governed by subsection (g). The Wildlife Resources Commission may prescribe the manner of taking wild animals and wild birds on game lands and public hunting grounds.

No wild animals or wild birds may be taken:

From or with the use of any vehicle; vessel, other than one manually propelled; airplane; or other conveyance except that the use of vehicles and vessels is authorized:

As hunting stands, subject to the following limitations. No wild animal or wild bird may be taken from any vessel under sail, under power, or with the engine running or while still in motion from such propulsion. No wild animal or wild bird may be taken from any vehicle if it is in motion, the engine is running, or the passenger area of the vehicle is occupied. The prohibition of occupying the passenger area of a vehicle does not apply to a disabled individual whose mobility is restricted.

For transportation incidental to the taking.

With the use or aid of any artificial light, net, trap, snare, electronic or recorded animal or bird call, or fire, except as may be otherwise provided by statute[;] provided, however, that the Wildlife Resources Commission may adopt rules prescribing seasons and the manner of taking of wild animals and wild birds with the use of artificial light and electronic calls. No wild birds may be taken with the use or aid of salt, grain, fruit, or other bait. No black bear may be taken with the use or aid of any salt, salt lick, grain, fruit, honey, sugar-based material, animal parts or products, or other bait, except as provided by the rules of the Wildlife Resources Commission. However, no rule established by the Wildlife Resources Commission shall allow for the taking of a black bear with the use and aid of bear bait attractants, including scented sprays, aerosols, scent balls, and scent powders, and no rule established by the Wildlife Resources Commission shall allow for the taking of a black bear while it is consuming bait. No wild turkey may knowingly be taken from within 300 yards of any place in which bait has been placed until the expiration of 10 days after the bait has been consumed or otherwise removed. The taking of wild animals and wild birds with poisons, drugs, explosives, and electricity is governed by

G.S. 113-261

,

G.S. 113-262

, and Article 22A of this Subchapter.Upon finding that the placement of processed food products in areas frequented by black bears is detrimental to the health of individual black bears or is attracting and holding black bears in an area to the extent that the natural pattern of movement and distribution of black bears is disrupted and bears’ vulnerability to mortality factors, including hunting, is increased to a level that causes concern for the population, the Wildlife Resources Commission may adopt rules to regulate, restrict, or prohibit the placement of those products and prescribe time limits during which hunting is prohibited in areas where those products have been placed.Any person who is convicted of unlawfully taking bear with the use or aid of any type of bait as provided by this subsection or by rules adopted pursuant to this subsection is punishable as provided by G.S. 113-294(c1).

It is a Class 1 misdemeanor for any person taking wildlife to have in his possession any:

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-369, s. 23, effective October 1, 2013.

Weapon of mass death and destruction as defined in

G.S. 14-288.8

, other than a suppressor or other device designed to muffle or minimize the report of a firearm or short-barreled rifle that is lawfully possessed by a person in compliance with 26 U.S.C. Chapter 53 §§ 5801-5871.The Wildlife Resources Commission may prohibit individuals training dogs or taking particular species from carrying axes, saws, tree-climbing equipment, and other implements that may facilitate the unlawful taking of wildlife, except tree-climbing equipment may be carried and used by persons lawfully taking raccoons and opossums during open season.

In accordance with governing rules of the Wildlife Resources Commission imposing further restrictions that may be necessary, hunters may conduct field trials with dogs in areas and at times authorized with the use of approved weapons and ammunition. The Wildlife Resources Commission may authorize organized retriever field trials, utilizing domestically raised waterfowl and game birds, to be held under its permit.

(d1)

Except in areas closed to protect sensitive wildlife populations, and subject to conditions and restrictions contained in rules of the Wildlife Resources Commission, hunters may train dogs during the closed season:

With the use of weapons and ammunition approved by the Wildlife Resources Commission;

If reasonable control is exercised to prevent the dogs from running unsupervised at large and from killing wild animals and wild birds;

On land owned or leased by the dog trainer or upon which the person has written permission to train dogs; and

Using domestically raised waterfowl and game birds, provided the birds are marked and sources are documented as required by the Wildlife Resources Commission.

Raccoons and opossum may be taken at night with dogs during seasons set by rules of the Wildlife Resources Commission with the use of artificial lights of a type designed or commonly used to aid in taking raccoon and opossum. No conveyance may be used in taking any raccoon or opossum at night, but incidental transportation of hunters and dogs to and from the site of hunting is permitted. The Wildlife Resources Commission may by rule prescribe restrictions respecting the taking of frogs, or other creatures not classified as wildlife which may be found in areas frequented by game, with the use of an artificial light, and may regulate the shining of lights at night in areas frequented by deer as provided in subsection (e1).

(e1)

After hearing sufficient evidence and finding as a fact that an area frequented by deer is subject to substantial unlawful night deer hunting or that residents in the area have been greatly inconvenienced by persons shining lights on deer, the Wildlife Resources Commission may by rule prohibit the intentional sweeping of that area with lights, or the intentional shining of lights on deer, during the period either:

From 11:00 p.m. until one-half hour before sunrise; or

From one-half hour after sunset until one-half hour before sunrise.

Before adopting this rule, the Wildlife Resources Commission must propose it at a public hearing in the area to be closed and seek the reactions of the local inhabitants. The rule must exempt necessary shining of lights by landholders, motorists engaged in normal travel on the highway, and campers and others legitimately in the area, who are not attempting to attract wildlife. This subsection does not limit the right of hunters to take raccoon and opossum with dogs lawfully at night with a light under the terms of subsection (e).

(e2)

If the Wildlife Resources Commission has enacted a rule under the authority of subsection (e1) prohibiting the shining of lights from 11:00 p.m. until one-half hour before sunrise in any county or area of a county, the Wildlife Resources Commission is authorized, without holding an additional public hearing, to extend the applicability of that rule to the period one-half hour after sunset to one-half hour before sunrise upon receipt of a resolution from the board of commissioners of the county requesting extension of the period.

To keep North Carolina provisions respecting migratory game birds in substantial conformity with applicable federal law and rules, the Wildlife Resources Commission may by rule, or as provided in subsection (f1) of this section, expand or modify provisions of this Article if necessary to achieve such conformity, including allowing the use of electronic calls. In particular, the Commission may prohibit the use of rifles, unplugged shotguns, live decoys, and sinkboxes in the taking of migratory game birds; vary shooting hours; adopt specific distances, not less than 300 yards, hunters must maintain from areas that have been baited, and fix the number of days afterwards during which it is still unlawful to take migratory game birds in the area; and adopt similar provisions with regard to the use of live decoys. In the absence of rules of the Wildlife Resources Commission to the contrary, the rules of the United States Department of the Interior prohibiting the use of rifles, unplugged shotguns, toxic shot and sinkboxes in taking migratory game birds in North Carolina shall apply, and any violation of such federal rules is unlawful.

(f1)

The Commission is authorized to issue proclamations to allow the use of electronic calls or unplugged shotguns to achieve substantial conformity with applicable federal law and rules established by the United States Department of Interior or any successor agency. The Commission may delegate this authority to the Executive Director. Each proclamation shall state the hour and date upon which it becomes effective and shall be issued at least 48 hours prior to the effective date and time. A permanent file of the text of all proclamations shall be maintained in the office of the Executive Director. Certified copies of proclamations are entitled to judicial notice in any civil or criminal proceeding.The Executive Director shall make a reasonable effort to give notice of the terms of any proclamation to persons who may be affected by it. This effort shall include press releases to communications media, posting of notices at boating access areas and other places where persons affected may gather, personal communication by agents of the Wildlife Resources Commission, and other measures designed to reach persons who may be affected. Proclamations under this subsection shall remain in force until rescinded following the same procedure established for enactment.

If a season is open permitting such method of taking for the species in question, a hunter may take rabbits, squirrels, opossum, raccoons, fur-bearing animals, and nongame animals and birds open to hunting with a pistol. In addition, a hunter or trapper lawfully taking a wild animal or wild bird by another lawful method may use a knife, pistol, or other swift method of killing the animal or bird taken. The Wildlife Resources Commission may, however, restrict or prohibit the carrying of firearms during special seasons or in special areas reserved for the taking of wildlife with primitive weapons or other restricted methods.

(g1)

The Wildlife Resources Commission may by rule prescribe the types of handguns and handgun ammunition that may be used in taking big game animals other than wild turkey. During the regular gun seasons for taking bear, deer and wild boar these animals may be taken with types of handguns and handgun ammunition that shall be approved for such use by the rules of the Wildlife Resources Commission. The Commission shall not provide any special season for the exclusive use of handguns in taking wildlife.

In the interests of enhancing the enjoyment of sportsmen, and if consistent with conservation objectives, the Wildlife Resources Commission may by rule relax requirements of this section on controlled shooting preserves and in other highly controlled situations.

The intentional destruction or substantial impairment of wildlife nesting or breeding areas or other purposeful acts to render them unfit is unlawful. These prohibitions include cutting down den trees, shooting into nests of wild animals or birds, and despoliation of dens, nests, or rookeries.

It is unlawful to take deer swimming or in water above the knees of the deer.

If a hunter kills or wounds a big game animal during the hunting hours authorized by subsection (a) of this section, the hunter may use a portable light source and a single dog on a leash to assist the hunter in retrieving the dead or wounded big game animal, and may dispatch a wounded big game animal using only a .22-caliber rimfire pistol, archery equipment, or a handgun otherwise legal for that hunting season. Pursuit and retrieval under this subsection may occur between the hours of one-half hour after sunset and 11:00 p.m. if necessary, but such pursuit and retrieval may not be accomplished using a motorized vehicle.For purposes of this section, the term “dispatch” means the quick and humane killing of a wounded animal to prevent further suffering through infection, starvation, or other distress in the wild.

History.

C.S., s. 2124; 1935, c. 486, s. 20; 1939, c. 235, s. 1; 1949, c. 1205, s. 3; 1955, c. 104; 1959, cc. 207, 500; 1961, c. 1182; 1963, c. 381; c. 697, ss. 1, 31/2; 1967, c. 858, s. 1; c. 1149, s. 1.5; 1969, cc. 75, 140; 1971, c. 439, ss. 1-3; c. 899, s. 1; 1973, c. 1096; c. 1262, s. 18; 1975, c. 669; 1977, c. 493; 1979, c. 830, s. 1; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1285, ss. 4-6; 1983, c. 137, ss. 1, 2; c. 492; 1985, c. 360; c. 554, ss. 1, 2; 1987, cc. 97, 134, 827, s. 98; 1993, c. 539, s. 862; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1995, c. 64, s. 1; 1999-120, s. 1; 2003-160, s. 1; 2005-76, ss. 1, 2; 2005-298, s. 1; 2007-401, s. 6; 2009-221, ss. 2, 3; 2011-22, s. 1; 2011-369, s. 4; 2013-283, s. 12; 2013-369, s. 23; 2015-195, s. 8; 2019-204, s. 11.

Local Modification.

Alamance: 1981, c. 410; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1180; Beaufort: 1997-132, s. 7; 1999-86, s. 1; 2001-19, s. 1; Davidson: 1981, c. 410; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1180; Hyde: 1997-132, s. 7; 1999-86, s. 1; 2001-19, s. 1; Randolph, Rockingham, Rowan and Wilkes: 1981, c. 410; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1180.

§ 113-291.1A.
Computer-assisted remote hunting prohibited.

It is unlawful for a person to engage in computer-assisted remote hunting or provide or operate a facility that allows others to engage in computer-assisted remote hunting if the wild animal or wild bird being hunted or shot is located in this State.

For purposes of this section “computer-assisted remote hunting” means the use of a computer or other device, equipment, or software, to remotely control the aiming and discharging of a firearm or other weapon, that allows a person, not physically present at the location of that firearm or other weapon, to hunt or shoot a wild animal or wild bird.

History.

2005-62, s. 1.

§ 113-291.2.
Seasons and bag limits on wild animals and birds; including animals and birds taken in bag; possession and transportation of wildlife after taking.

In accordance with the supply of wildlife and other factors it determines to be of public importance, the Wildlife Resources Commission may fix seasons and bag limits upon the wild animals and wild birds authorized to be taken that it deems necessary or desirable in the interests of the conservation of wildlife resources. The authority to fix seasons includes the closing of seasons completely when necessary and fixing the hours of hunting. The authority to fix bag limits includes the setting of season and possession limits. Different seasons and bag limits may be set in differing areas; early or extended seasons and different or unlimited bag limits may be authorized on controlled shooting preserves, game lands, and public hunting grounds; and special or extended seasons may be fixed for those engaging in falconry, using primitive weapons, or taking wildlife under other special conditions.Unless modified by rules of the Wildlife Resources Commission or as provided in subsection (f) of this section, the seasons, shooting hours, bag limits, and possession limits fixed by the United States Department of Interior or any successor agency for migratory game birds in North Carolina must be followed, and a violation of the applicable federal rules is hereby made unlawful. When the applicable federal rules require that the State limit participation in seasons and/or bag limits for migratory game birds, the Wildlife Resources Commission may schedule managed hunts for migratory game birds. Participants in such hunts shall be selected at random by computer, and each applicant 16 years of age or older shall have the required general hunting license and the waterfowl hunting license prior to the drawing for the managed hunt. Each applicant under 16 years of age shall either have the required general hunting license and the waterfowl hunting license or shall apply as a member of a party that includes a properly licensed adult. All applications for managed waterfowl hunts shall be screened prior to the drawing for compliance with these requirements. A nonrefundable fee of ten dollars ($10.00) shall be required of each applicant to defray the cost of processing the applications.

(a1)

When the Executive Director of the Wildlife Resources Commission receives a petition from the State Health Director declaring a rabies emergency for a particular county or district pursuant to

G.S. 130A-201

, the Executive Director of the Wildlife Resources Commission shall develop a plan to reduce the threat of rabies exposure to humans and domestic animals by foxes, raccoons, skunks, or bobcats in the county or district. The plan shall be based upon the best veterinary and wildlife management information and techniques available. The plan may involve a suspension or liberalization of any regulatory restriction on the taking of foxes, raccoons, skunks, or bobcats, except that the use of poisons, other than those used with dart guns, shall not be permitted under any circumstance. If the plan involves a suspension or liberalization of any regulatory restriction on the taking of foxes, raccoons, skunks, or bobcats, the Executive Director of the Wildlife Resources Commission shall prepare and adopt temporary rules setting out the suspension or liberalization pursuant to G.S. 150B-21.1(a)(1). The Executive Director shall publicize the plan and the temporary rules in the major news outlets that serve the county or district to inform the public of the actions being taken and the reasons for them. Upon notification by the State Health Director that the rabies emergency no longer exists, the Executive Director of the Wildlife Resources Commission shall cancel the plan and repeal any rules adopted to implement the plan. The Executive Director of the Wildlife Resources Commission shall publicize the cancellation of the plan and the repeal of any rules in the major news outlets that serve the county or district.

Any individual hunter or trapper who in taking a wild animal or bird has wounded or otherwise disabled it must make a reasonable effort to capture and kill the animal or bird. All animals and birds taken that can be retrieved must be retrieved and counted with respect to any applicable bag limits governing the individual taking the animal or bird.

An individual who has lawfully taken game within applicable bag, possession, and season limits may, except as limited by rules adopted pursuant to subsection (c1) of this section, after the game is dead, possess and personally transport it for his own use by virtue of his hunting license, and without any additional permit, subject to tagging and reporting requirements that may apply to the fox and big game, as follows:

In an area in which the season is open for the species, the game may be possessed and transported without restriction.

The individual may possess and transport the game lawfully taken on a trip:

To his residence;

To a preservation or processing facility that keeps adequate records as prescribed in G.S. 113-291.3(b)(3) or a licensed taxidermist;

From a place authorized in subparagraph b to his residence.

The individual may possess the game indefinitely at his residence, and may there accumulate lawfully-acquired game up to the greater of:

The applicable possession limit for each species; or

One half of the applicable season limit for each species.The above subdivisions apply to an individual hunter under 16 years of age covered by the license issued to his parent or guardian, if he is using that license, or by the license of an adult accompanying him. An individual who has lawfully taken game as a landholder without a license may possess and transport the dead game, taken within applicable bag, possession, and season limits, to his residence. He may indefinitely retain possession of such game, within aggregate possession limits for the species in question, in his residence.

(c1)

In the event that the Executive Director finds that game carcasses or parts of game carcasses are known or suspected to carry an infectious or contagious disease that poses an imminent threat to the health or habitat of wildlife species, the Wildlife Resources Commission shall adopt rules to regulate the importation, transportation, or possession of those carcasses or parts of carcasses that, according to wildlife disease experts, may transmit such a disease.

Except in the situations specifically provided for above, the Wildlife Resources Commission may by rule impose reporting, permit, and tagging requirements that may be necessary upon persons:

Possessing dead wildlife taken in open season after the close of that season.

Transporting dead wildlife from an area having an open season to an area with a closed season.

Transporting dead wildlife lawfully taken in another state into this State.

Possessing dead wildlife after such transportation.

The Wildlife Resources Commission in its discretion may substitute written declarations to be filed with agents of the Commission for permit and tagging requirements.

Upon application of any landholder or agent of a landholder accompanied by a fee of fifty dollars ($50.00), the Executive Director may issue to such landholder or agent a special license and a number of special antlerless or antlered deer tags that in the judgment of the Executive Director is sufficient to accommodate the landholder or the landholder’s agent’s deer population management objectives or correct any deer population imbalance that may occur on the property. Subject to applicable hunting license requirements, the special deer tags may be used by any person or persons selected by the landholder or his agent as authority to take antlerless deer, including male deer with “buttons” or spikes not readily visible, or antlered deer on the tract of land concerned during any established deer hunting season. The Executive Director or designee may stipulate on the license that special deer tags for antlered deer, if applicable, may only be valid for deer that meet certain minimum harvest criteria. The Executive Director or designee may also define on the license valid hunt dates that fall outside of the general deer hunting season. Harvested antlerless or antlered deer for which special tags are issued shall be affixed immediately with a special deer tag and shall be reported immediately in the wildlife cooperator tagging book supplied with the special deer tags. This tagging book and any unused tags shall be returned to the Commission within 15 days of the close of the season. The Wildlife Resources Commission may offer an alternate reporting system when the Commission determines that such an alternate system is appropriate. Antlerless or antlered deer taken under this program and tagged with the special tags provided shall not count as part of the daily bag, possession, and season limits of the person taking the deer.

The Commission is authorized to issue proclamations to set seasons, shooting hours, bag limits, and possession limits that are congruent with the season framework established by the United States Department of Interior or any successor agency. The Commission may delegate this authority to the Executive Director. Each proclamation shall state the hour and date upon which it becomes effective and shall be issued at least 48 hours prior to the effective date and time. A permanent file of the text of all proclamations shall be maintained in the office of the Executive Director. Certified copies of proclamations are entitled to judicial notice in any civil or criminal proceeding.The Executive Director shall make a reasonable effort to give notice of the terms of any proclamation to persons who may be affected by it. This effort shall include press releases to communications media, posting of notices at boating access areas and other places where persons affected may gather, personal communication by agents of the Wildlife Resources Commission, and other measures designed to reach persons who may be affected. Proclamations under this subsection shall remain in force until rescinded following the same procedure established for enactment.

History.

1935, c. 486, ss. 16, 17; 1949, c. 1205, s. 1; 1973, c. 1262, s. 18; 1977, c. 499, s. 1; 1979, c. 830, s. 1; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1285, s. 7; 1981, c. 681, s. 1; 1987, c. 38; c. 827, s. 98; 1989, c. 642, s. 2; 1995, c. 181, s. 1; 1997-402, s. 2; 1999-339, s. 7; 2003-344, ss. 7, 8; 2005-82, s. 2; 2007-401, s. 3; 2009-221, s. 1.

Local Modification.

Alleghany: 2011-32, ss. 1, 2 (as to foxes and coyotes); Anson: 1987, c. 231, s. 3; 1995, c. 55, s. 1; Beaufort: 1997-132, ss. 1-3; 1999-86, s. 1; 2001-19, s. 1; Chowan: 2009-43, ss. 1, 2, as amended by 2011-40, s. 1 (as to foxes); Davidson: 2009-43, ss. 1, 2, as amended by 2011-40, s. 1 (as to foxes); Hyde: 1997-132, ss. 1-3; 1999-86, s. 1; 2001-19, s. 1; Surry: 2011-32, ss. 1, 2 (as to foxes and coyotes).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-82, s. 2, effective June 14, 2005, rewrote the second paragraph of subsection (a).

Session Laws 2007-401, s. 3, effective October 1, 2007, and applicable to acts committed on or after that date, deleted the last undesignated paragraph of subsection (a), which read: “Where there is a muzzle-loading firearm season for deer, with a bag limit of five or more, one antlerless deer may be taken. Dogs may not be used for hunting deer during such season.”; and rewrote subsection (e).

Session Laws 2009-221, s. 1, effective July 1, 2009, in the first sentence of the second paragraph of subsection (a), inserted “or as provided in subsection (f) of this section”; and added subsection (f).

§ 113-291.3.
Possession, sale, and transportation of wildlife.

Live wildlife and the nests and eggs of wild birds may be taken, possessed, transported, bought, sold, imported, exported, or otherwise acquired or disposed of only as specifically authorized in this Subchapter or its implementing rules. The Wildlife Resources Commission may impose necessary reporting, permit, and tagging requirements in regulating activities involving live wildlife and the nests and eggs of wild birds. The Wildlife Resources Commission may charge a reasonable fee to defray the cost of any tagging procedure.

With respect to dead wildlife:

Lawfully taken wildlife may be possessed and transported as provided in

G.S. 113-291.2

. Wildlife possessed under any dealer license may be possessed and transported in accordance with the provisions of law and rules applicable to the license, and wildlife may be sold to qualified persons if authorized under provisions governing the license. In other situations, except as this Subchapter may expressly provide, possession and transportation of wildlife may be regulated by the Wildlife Resources Commission.

Unless there is a specific restriction on the transfer of the species in question, an individual may accept the gift of wildlife lawfully taken within North Carolina if taking possession does not cause him to exceed applicable possession limits. If he notes and preserves in writing the name and address of the donor and under what license or exemption from license requirements the wildlife was taken, he may possess that wildlife without a permit in the places possession without a permit would be authorized in

G.S. 113-291.2

had he taken the wildlife.

A licensed taxidermist or other licensed dealer taking temporary possession of wildlife of another may possess the wildlife that he is authorized to handle under his license in accordance with the rules of the Wildlife Resources Commission. A person not a dealer operating a preservation or processing facility, whether commercially or not, may possess the wildlife owned by another without any permit or license if he ascertains that the wildlife was lawfully taken within the State and keeps a written record of:

The name and address of the owner of the wildlife and an adequate description of the wildlife left with him. If the description of the wildlife changes as the result of processing, the new description must be recorded.

The date, authorization number, and type of the license under which the wildlife was taken or the applicable exemption from license requirements which the taker met.

The date all wildlife left with him is received and returned to the owner. If the receiving or returning of possession is to an agent or common carrier or otherwise occurs under circumstances in which permit requirements may apply, the type and date of the permit which authorizes the transaction must also be recorded.

The sale of rabbits and squirrels and their edible parts not for resale is permitted. If the Wildlife Resources Commission finds that affected game populations would not be endangered, it may authorize the sale of heads, antlers, horns, hides, skins, plumes, feet, and claws of one or more game animals or birds. In addition, it may authorize the sale of bobcats, opossums, and raccoons, and their parts, following their taking as game animals. No part of any bear or wild turkey may be sold under the above provisions, however, permanently preserved bears or tanned bear hides and permanently preserved turkeys or turkey parts may be sold with a trophy sale permit. No part of any fox taken in North Carolina may be sold except as provided in

G.S. 113-291.4

. In regulating sales, the Wildlife Resources Commission may impose necessary permit requirements.

Lawfully taken fur-bearing animals and their parts, including furs and pelts, may, subject to any tagging and reporting requirements, be possessed, transported, bought, sold, given or received as a gift, or otherwise disposed of without restriction. The skin of deer lawfully taken by hunting may be possessed, transported, bought, or sold, subject to tagging and reporting requirements and any season limits set by the Wildlife Resources Commission. The Wildlife Resources Commission may regulate the importation of wildlife from without the State by fur dealers, and may regulate the sale of fox fur and other wildlife hides taken within the State if sale of them is authorized. Fox furs lawfully taken without the State may be imported, possessed, transported, bought, sold, and exported in accordance with reasonable rules of the Wildlife Resources Commission. Processed furs acquired through lawful channels within or without the State by persons other than fur dealers are not subject to rule.

Nongame animals and birds open to hunting and nongame fish lawfully taken, except as this Subchapter and its implementing rules expressly provide otherwise, may be possessed, transported, bought, sold, given or received as a gift, or otherwise disposed of without restriction.

The possession and disposition of wild animals and wild birds killed accidentally or to prevent or halt depredations to property are governed by G.S. 113-274(c)(1a).

The edible parts of deer raised domestically in another state may be transported into this State and resold as a meat product for human consumption when the edible parts have passed inspection in the other state by that state’s inspection agency or the United States Department of Agriculture.

The Wildlife Resources Commission may make reasonable rules governing the marking of packages, crates, and other containers in which wildlife may be shipped.

Any person hiring a hunter or trapper to take game is deemed to be buying game. Any hunter or trapper who may be hired is deemed to be selling game.

History.

1935, c. 486, ss. 19, 22; 1941, c. 231, s. 1; 1973, c. 1262, s. 18; 1979, c. 830, s. 1; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1285, s. 8; 1987, c. 827, s. 98; 1997-142, s. 15; 1997-456, s. 44; 2015-18, s. 1; 2019-204, s. 3.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-18, s. 1, effective October 1, 2015, inserted the second sentence in subdivision (b)(5). For applicability, see editor’s note.

Session Laws 2019-204, s. 3, effective September 1, 2019, substituted “authorization number” for “serial number” in subdivision (b)(3)b; and substituted “permanently preserved bears or tanned bear hides and permanently preserved turkeys or turkey parts may be sold with a trophy sale permit. No” for “and no” in the third sentence of subdivision (b)(4).

§ 113-291.4.
Regulation of foxes; study of fox and fur-bearer populations.

All of the regulatory powers granted the Wildlife Resources Commission generally with respect to game, wild animals, and wildlife apply to foxes unless there are specific overriding restrictions in this section.

Except for any closed season under subsection (h), foxes may be taken with dogs both night and day on a year-round basis.

Foxes may not be taken with firearms except:

As provided in subsection (f) or (i) of this section or

G.S. 113-291.4

A(a).

As an incidental method of humanely killing them following any lawful method of taking that does not result in death.

When they are lawfully shot under laws and rules pertaining to the destruction of animals committing depredations to property.

Foxes may not be taken with the aid of any electronic calling device.

The Wildlife Resources Commission is directed to improve its capabilities for studying fox and fur-bearer populations generally and, on the basis of its present knowledge and future studies, to implement management methods and impose controls designed to produce optimum fox and fur-bearer populations in the various areas of the State.

If, on the basis of its studies and other information available, the Wildlife Resources Commission determines the population of foxes in an area is fully adequate to support a harvesting of that population, the Wildlife Resources Commission may, upon passage of local legislation permitting same, open a season for taking foxes by trapping. When the season is open for trapping, foxes may also be taken by the use of methods lawful for taking game animals, including the use of firearms. Any bag, possession, or season limits imposed on foxes taken from the area in question will apply in the aggregate to all foxes killed without regard to the method of taking.

(f1)

In those counties in which open seasons for taking foxes with weapons and by trapping were established between June 18, 1982, and July 1, 1987, in accordance with the procedure then set forth in subsection (f) of this section, the Wildlife Resources Commission is authorized to continue such seasons from year to year so long as the fox populations of such counties remain adequate to support the resulting harvest. The counties referred to in this subsection are as follows: Caswell, Clay, Graham, Henderson, Hyde, Macon, and Tyrrell.

The Wildlife Resources Commission may provide for the sale of foxes lawfully taken in areas of open season as provided in subsection (f), under a system providing strict controls. The Wildlife Resources Commission must implement a system of tagging foxes and fox furs with a special fox tag, and the Commission may charge two dollars and twenty-five cents ($2.25) for each tag furnished to hunters, trappers, and fur dealers. The fox tag or tags must be procured before taking foxes by any method designed to kill foxes or when the intent is to harvest foxes. The number of tags furnished to any individual may be limited as to area and as to number in accordance with area, bag, possession, or season limits that may be imposed on foxes. No person may continue to hunt or trap foxes under this fox harvesting provision unless he still has at least one valid unused fox tag lawful for use in the area in question. A person hunting foxes with dogs not intending to kill them need not have any fox tag, but any fox accidentally killed by that hunter must be disposed of without sale as provided below, and no foxes not tagged may be sold. The Wildlife Resources Commission may by rule provide reporting and controlled-disposition requirements, not including sale, of foxes killed accidentally by dog hunters, motor vehicles, and in other situations; it may also impose strict controls on the disposition of foxes taken by owners of property under the laws and rules relating to depredations, and authorize sale under controlled conditions of foxes taken under depredation permits.

In any area of the State in which the Wildlife Resources Commission determines that hunting of foxes with dogs has an appreciably harmful effect upon turkey restoration projects, it may declare a closed season for an appropriate length of time upon the taking with dogs of all species of wild animals and birds. Except as otherwise provided in G.S. 113-291.1(d) or (d1), this subsection does not prohibit lawful field trials or the training of dogs.

Upon notification by the State Health Director of the presence of a contagious animal disease in a local fox population, the Commission is authorized to establish such population control measures as are appropriate until notified by public health authorities that the problem is deemed to have passed.

The Wildlife Resources Commission shall prohibit the use of dogs in hunting foxes during the period from March 15 through July 15 in Bladen Lakes State Forest Game Land.

History.

1979, c. 830, s. 1; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1203, ss. 1-3; 1985, c. 476, s. 2; 1987, c. 726, s. 1; c. 827, s. 98; 1989, c. 504, s. 2; c. 616, s. 4; c. 727, s. 113; 1991, c. 483, s. 1(a), (b); 1993, c. 208, s. 4; 2008-102, s. 3; 2015-144, s. 7(a).

Local Modification.

Alleghany: 2011-32, ss. 1, 2; Chowan: 2009-43, ss. 1, 2, as amended by 2011-40, s. 1; Davidson: 2009-43, ss. 1, 2, as amended by 2011-40, s. 1; Surry: 2011-32, ss. 1, 2.